Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Assessment for Promotion of Beef Cattle Industry

247.610.
Promotion of beef cattle industry.

It is declared to be in the interest of the public welfare that Kentucky farmers who are producers of bovine animals shall be permitted and encouraged to act jointly and in cooperation with all producers, handlers, dealers, and processors of bovine animals in promoting and stimulating, by research, market development, and education, the use and sale, domestic and foreign, of bovine animal products.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 9, § 1; 2004, ch. 32, § 3, effective July 13, 2004.

247.615.
Definitions for KRS 247.620 to 247.685.

As used in KRS

247.620

to

247.685

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Association” means any commission, council, board, or other body;

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture;

“Board” means the State Board of Agriculture;

“Producer” means every person who produces bovine animals and thereafter causes the same to be marketed;

“New producer” means a producer who was not engaged in the business of producing bovine animals at the time a referendum was conducted in accordance with the provisions of KRS

247.620

to

247.685

;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, association, cooperative, or other business entity; and

“Order buyer” means any person who purchases bovine animals in Kentucky and is registered under the United States Department of Agriculture, Packers and Stockyards Act of 1921, as amended, and the regulations thereunder. This does not include producers who do not engage in the business of buying and selling bovine animals.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 9, § 2; 1980, ch. 213, § 1, effective July 15, 1980.

247.620.
Association of producers not illegal or in restraint of trade.

No association meeting or activity undertaken in pursuance of the provisions of KRS

247.610

to

247.685

and intended to benefit all of the producers, handlers, and processors of bovine animals shall be deemed or considered illegal or in restraint of trade.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 9, § 3.

247.625.
Referendum levying assessment.

It is hereby further declared to be in the public interest and highly advantageous to the agricultural economy of the state that producers of bovine animals shall be permitted by referendum to be held among the respective groups and subject to the provisions of KRS

247.610

to

247.685

to levy upon themselves an assessment on bovine animals and provide for the collection of the assessment for the purpose of financing or contributing towards the financing of a program of research, market development, and education to increase the domestic and foreign consumption, use, sale, and markets for bovine animal products.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 9, § 4; 2004, ch. 32, § 4, effective July 13, 2004.

247.630.
Application for assessment referendum — Contents of form — Publication.

Any existing association which is fairly representative of the bovine animal producers of Kentucky, such as the Kentucky Beef Cattle Association, may at any time after the enactment of KRS

247.610

to

247.685

make application to the State Board of Agriculture on forms prescribed by such board for certification and approval for the purpose of conducting a referendum among the producers of bovine animals upon the question of levying an assessment under the provisions of KRS

247.610

to

247.685

, collecting and utilizing the same for the purpose stated in such referendum. Such application forms shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Applicant’s name;

Applicant’s address;

Date;

Program to be undertaken for producers;

Brief statement of how the program is to be implemented;

Referendum to be conducted on a statewide or area basis;

Proposed effective date of the program;

Geographic area, by counties, of producers to be affected by the program; and

Signature of the applicant.

Upon receipt of such application, the Commissioner shall publish such application through the medium of the public press in the state within ten (10) days of receipt thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 9, § 5.

247.635.
Certified association authorized to hold referendum.

Upon being so certified by the Commissioner of Agriculture, such association shall thereupon be fully authorized and empowered to hold and conduct on the part of the producers of bovine animals a referendum on the question of whether or not such producers shall levy upon themselves an assessment under, and subject to, and for the purposes stated in KRS

247.610

to

247.685

. Such referendum may be conducted either on a statewide or area basis.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 9, § 6.

247.640.
Referendum on area or statewide basis — Participation eligibility.

Any referendum conducted under the provisions of KRS

247.610

to

247.685

may be held either on an area or statewide basis, as may be determined by such duly certified association before such referendum is called; and such referendum, on an area or statewide basis, may be participated in by all bovine cattle producers, including owners of farms on which such bovine cattle are produced and tenants sharing in the proceeds of bovine cattle. In the referendum, individuals so eligible for participation shall vote upon the question of whether or not there shall be levied an assessment in the amount set forth in the call for the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 9, § 7.

247.645.
Supervision of referendum by Commissioner — Expenses.

The manner, conduct, and management of any referendum held under the provisions of KRS

247.610

to

247.685

shall be under the supervision and direction of the Commissioner of Agriculture, and any and all expenses in connection therewith shall be borne by the association conducting the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 9, § 8.

247.650.
Commissioner to determine date, hours, polling places for voting and details of assessment — Limits — Exceptions.

With respect to any referendum conducted under the provisions of KRS

247.610

to

247.685

, the Commissioner of Agriculture shall, before calling and announcing the referendum, fix, determine, and publicly announce at least thirty (30) days before the date determined for the referendum, the date, hours, and polling places for voting in the referendum, the effective date of the assessment, if adopted, the amount and basis of the assessment proposed to be collected, the means by which the assessment shall be collected if authorized by the producers, and the general purposes to which the amount collected shall be applied. No assessment levied under the provisions of any single referendum shall exceed one dollar ($1) on each bovine animal marketed in the state by any producer included in the group to which the referendum was submitted or by any person subsequently becoming a new producer in the area in which the referendum was held.

No assessment shall be made on any bovine animal marketed in the state which sells for ten dollars ($10) or less.

Any assessment levied after June 25, 2013, shall be in addition to the federal assessment referenced in KRS

247.652

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 9, § 9; 2004, ch. 32, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2013, ch. 129, § 1, effective June 25, 2013.

247.652.
Credit of up to fifty cents to producer on each bovine animal on which one dollar assessment was made — Assessment to be collected if federal assessment is terminated.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

247.610

to

247.685

, in accordance with the Federal Beef Promotion and Research Act of 1985, each Kentucky producer of a bovine animal shall receive a credit of up to fifty cents ($0.50) on each bovine animal on which a one dollar ($1) assessment was made under the terms of the federal act. Each fifty cent ($0.50) credit received by the producer shall be retained by the association certified under KRS

247.610

to

247.685

and shall be used by the association for the purposes provided in KRS 247.610 to 247.685.

In the event the one dollar ($1) assessment provided by the federal act is terminated or suspended, that assessment on each Kentucky producer of a bovine animal shall continue to be collected, shall be retained by the association certified under KRS

247.610

to

247.685

, and shall be used for the purposes provided in KRS

247.610

to

247.685

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 388, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2004, ch. 32, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2013, ch. 129, § 2, effective June 25, 2013.

247.655.
Rules governing holding of referendum prescribed by Commissioner — Notice.

The hours, voting places, rules and regulations, and the area within which the referendum will be conducted shall be established and determined by the Commissioner of Agriculture; the said referendum date, area, hours, voting places, rules and regulations with respect to the holding of the referendum shall be published by the Commissioner through the medium of the public press in the Commonwealth of Kentucky at least thirty (30) days before the holding of such referendum, and direct written notice thereof shall likewise be given to each county or area agricultural extension agent in any county covered by such referendum. Such notice shall likewise contain a statement of the amount of the assessment proposed to be levied, and shall likewise state the method by which such assessment shall be collected and how the proceeds thereof shall be administered and the purposes to which the same shall be applied, which purposes shall be in keeping with the provisions of KRS

247.610

to

247.685

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 9, § 10.

247.660.
Preparation of question — Poll holders — Canvass and declaration of results.

The Commissioner of Agriculture shall likewise prepare and distribute in advance of such referendum the question to be presented to the voters and shall arrange for the necessary poll holders for conducting the referendum. Following such referendum and within ten (10) days thereafter the Commissioner shall canvass and publicly declare the result of such referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 9, § 11; 1982, ch. 360, § 72, effective July 15, 1982.

247.665.
Effect of affirmative vote.

If, in such referendum called under the provisions of KRS

247.610

to

247.685

, a majority of the eligible producers in the area in which such referendum is conducted, who vote therein, shall vote in the affirmative and in favor of levying and collecting such assessment proposed in such referendum, then such assessment shall be collected in the manner determined and announced by the association conducting such referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 9, § 12.

247.670.
Notice as to deduction required — Disposition of collections — Records.

In the event a majority of the eligible producers in such referendum who vote therein shall vote in favor of the assessment, then the Commissioner shall notify forthwith, by certified mail, every person licensed to operate a livestock market in the state, as well as every person who operates a meat packing or slaughter establishment which buys bovine animals directly from the producer and every order buyer, that on and after the date designated in the notice, which shall be not less than thirty (30) days nor more than sixty (60) days after the mailing of the notice by the Commissioner, the amount of the assessment shall be deducted by all such sales markets or purchasers of bovine animals, or by their agents or representatives, from the purchase price paid the seller of bovine animals.

On or before the fifteenth day of each month all assessments deducted shall be remitted to the association certified by the assessment referendum, less three percent (3%) which may be retained to compensate the stockyard operator, meat packer, order buyer, or slaughter establishment operator for the expense of collecting and remitting the assessment.

The books and records of all stockyard operators, meat packers, order buyers, and slaughter establishment operators shall at all times during regular business hours be open for inspection by the Commissioner or his duly authorized agents for the purpose of ascertaining the accuracy of the amounts remitted.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 9, § 13; 1980, ch. 114, § 49, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 213, § 2, effective July 15, 1980.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

This section was amended by two 1980 acts which do not appear to be in conflict and have been compiled together.

247.675.
Refund of assessment collected from producer.

In the event the referendum is carried in the affirmative and the assessment is levied and collected as provided, any producer upon and against whom such assessment shall have been levied and collected under the provisions of KRS

247.610

to

247.685

, if dissatisfied with said assessment and the result thereof, shall have the right to demand of and receive from the treasurer of said certified association a refund of such assessment so collected from such producer; provided, such demand for refund is made in writing within thirty (30) days from the date on which said assessment is collected from such producer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 9, § 14.

247.680.
Annual review of assessment program — Referendum required, when — Termination of program.

The board shall review the assessment program annually. If, at the end of each year after the first year of the assessment program, the board determines that fifty percent (50%) of the producers in the referendum area are not participating in the program, the Commissioner shall then conduct a referendum among the producers in such area. If, upon such referendum, a majority of the producers in the area reject the program, it shall be terminated as of the end of the month in which the referendum for the area was conducted and held; otherwise, such assessment program shall continue in force and effect.

If the certified association of producers expresses in writing its desire to the Commissioner to discontinue the assessment program and terminate the same, the Commissioner shall within fifteen (15) days following receipt of the request convene the board to review and act on the request. The board, after reviewing such request and conducting whatever proceedings are deemed appropriate and necessary in connection with the request, may terminate the program effective at the end of the month in which the board action is taken; and in this event the Commissioner shall notify, by certified mail, all operators of a livestock market, meat packing establishment or slaughter establishment of the termination of the program.

If the certified association requests in writing to the Commissioner to hold a referendum on the question of increasing the assessment within the limits of KRS

247.610

to

247.685

, the Commissioner shall within fifteen (15) days of the receipt of the request convene the board to review and act on the request. The board, after reviewing the request and conducting whatever proceedings are deemed appropriate and necessary with the request, shall, if the request is approved, conduct a referendum in accordance with the provisions of KRS

247.610

to

247.685

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 9, § 15; 1980, ch. 114, § 50, effective July 15, 1980.

247.685.
Injunction against violations.

Whenever in the judgment of the board or the duly certified association, an operator of a livestock market, meat packing establishment, or slaughter establishment, or an order buyer has engaged in or is about to engage in any acts or practices that constitute a violation of any of the provisions of KRS

247.610

to

247.685

, the board or the duly certified association may make application to the Franklin Circuit Court for an order enjoining such act, or acts, or practices and obtain a restraining order and preliminary injunction against such operator or order buyer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 9, § 16; 1980, ch. 213, § 3, effective July 15, 1980.